Idaho, session 2026, H0839.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3612, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3612. SALE. (1) The term "sale" means any transfer of title, ex-
change or barter, conditional or otherwise, of tangible personal property
for a consideration and shall include any similar transfer of possession
found by the state tax commission to be in lieu of, or equivalent to, a trans-
fer of title, exchange or barter.
(2) "Sale" shall also include the following transactions when a consid-
eration is transferred, exchanged or bartered:
(a) Producing, fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting of
tangible personal property for consumers who furnish, either directly
or indirectly, the tangible personal property used in the producing,
fabricating, processing, printing, or imprinting.
(b) Furnishing, preparing, or serving food, meals, or drinks and nonde-
preciable goods and services directly consumed by customers included in
the charge thereof.
(c) A transfer of possession of property where the seller retains the
title as security for the payment of the sales price.
(d) A transfer of the title or possession of tangible personal property
which has been produced, fabricated, or printed to the special order of
the customer, or of any publication.
(e) Admission to a place or for an event in Idaho, provided that an or-
ganization conducting an exempt function as defined in section 527 or
exempted by section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, as incor-
porated in section 63-3004, Idaho Code, and collecting any charges for
attendance at the aforementioned event, shall not have those admission
charges be defined as a sale if the event:
(i) Is not predominately recreational or commercial; and
(ii) Any included entertainment value is minimal when compared to
the charge for attendance; and
(iii) Such entity has paid sales and use tax on taxable property or
services used during the event.
(f) The use of or the privilege of using tangible personal property or
facilities for recreation.


(g) Providing hotel, motel, campground, or trailer court accommo-
dations, nondepreciable goods directly consumed by customers and
included services, except:
(i) where Where residence is maintained continuously under the
terms of a lease or similar agreement for a period in excess of
thirty (30) days.; or
(ii) Accommodations for redemptions of loyalty or rewards program
points where monetary consideration has not been paid for the ac-
commodations by the program member; however, sales tax shall apply
to monetary consideration paid by a loyalty program to an accom-
modations owner or operator when loyalty or reward points are re-
deemed for the providing of customer accommodations.
(h) The lease or rental of tangible personal property.
(i) The intrastate transportation for hire by air of freight or passen-
gers, except (1) as part of a regularly scheduled flight by a certified
air carrier, under authority of the United States, or (2) when providing
air ambulance services.
(3) As used in subsections (2)(b) and (2)(g) of this section, goods "di-
rectly consumed by customers" shall not be interpreted to mean any linens,
bedding, cloth napkins or similar nondisposable property.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-3613, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3613. SALES PRICE. (a) The term "sales price" means the total
amount for which tangible personal property, including services agreed to be
rendered as a part of the sale, is sold, rented or leased, valued in money,
whether paid in money or otherwise, without any deduction on account of any
of the following:
1. The cost of the property sold. However, in accordance with such
rules as the state tax commission may prescribe, a deduction may be
taken if the retailer has purchased property for some purpose other than
resale or rental, has reimbursed his vendor for tax which the vendor is
required to pay to the state or has paid the use tax with respect to the
property, and has resold or rented the property prior to making any use
of the property other than retention, demonstration or display while
holding it for sale in the regular course of business. If such a deduc-
tion is taken by the retailer, no refund or credit will be allowed to his
vendor with respect to the sale of the property.
2. The cost of materials used, labor or service cost, losses, or any
other expense.
3. The cost of transportation of the property prior to its sale.
4. The face value of manufacturer's discount coupons. A manufacturer's
discount coupon is a price reduction coupon presented by a consumer to
a retailer upon purchase of a manufacturer's product, the face value of
which may only be reimbursed by the manufacturer to the retailer.
(b) The term "sales price" does not include any of the following:
1. Retailer discounts allowed and taken on sales, but only to the extent
that such retailer discounts represent price adjustments as opposed to
cash discounts offered only as an inducement for prompt payment.


2. Any sums allowed on merchandise accepted in payment of other mer-
chandise, provided that this allowance shall not apply to the sale of a
"new manufactured home," a "new park model recreational vehicle" or a
"modular building" as defined herein.
3. The amount charged for property returned by customers when the
amount charged therefor is refunded either in cash or credit; but this
exclusion shall not apply in any instance when the customer, in order
to obtain the refund, is required to purchase other property at a price
greater than the amount charged for the property that is returned.
4. The amount charged for labor or services rendered in installing or
applying the property sold, provided that said amount is stated sepa-
rately and such separate statement is not used as a means of avoiding
imposition of this tax upon the actual sales price of the tangible per-
sonal property; except that charges by a manufactured homes dealer or
park model recreational vehicle dealer for set up of a manufactured
home or park model recreational vehicle shall be included in the "sales
price" of such manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle.
5. The amount of any tax (not including, however, any manufacturers' or
importers' excise tax) imposed by the United States upon or with respect
to retail sales whether imposed upon the retailer or the consumer.
6. The amount charged for finance charges, carrying charges, service
charges, time-price differential, or interest on deferred payment
sales, provided such charges are not used as a means of avoiding impo-
sition of this tax upon the actual sales price of the tangible personal
property.
7. Delivery and handling charges for transportation of tangible per-
sonal property to the consumer, provided that the transportation is
stated separately and the separate statement is not used as a means of
avoiding imposition of the tax upon the actual sales price of the tan-
gible personal property; except that charges by a manufactured homes
dealer or park model recreational vehicle dealer for transportation
of a manufactured home or park model recreational vehicle shall be in-
cluded in the "sales price" of such manufactured home or park model
recreational vehicle.
8. Manufacturers' rebates when used at the time of a retail sale as a
down payment on or reduction to the retail sales price of a motor vehi-
cle the following products to which the rebate applies: motor vehicles
as defined in section 63-3605L, Idaho Code; and all-terrain vehicles,
utility type vehicles, specialty off-highway vehicles, motorbikes, and
snowmobiles, as those terms are defined in section 67-7101, Idaho Code.
A manufacturer's rebate is a cash payment made by a manufacturer to a re-
tailer or to a consumer who has purchased or is purchasing the manufac-
turer's product from the retailer.
9. The amount of any fee imposed upon an outfitter as defined in section
36-2102, Idaho Code, by a governmental entity pursuant to statute for
the purpose of conducting outfitting activities on land or water sub-
ject to the jurisdiction of the governmental entity, provided that the
fee is stated separately and is presented as a use fee paid by the out-
fitted public to be passed through to the governmental entity.


10. The amount of any discount or other price reduction on telecommuni-
cations equipment when offered as an inducement to the consumer to com-
mence or continue telecommunications service, or the amount of any com-
mission or other indirect compensation received by a retailer or seller
as a result of the consumer commencing or continuing telecommunications
service.
(c) The sales price of a "new manufactured home" or a "modular building"
as defined in this chapter shall be limited to and include only fifty-five
percent (55%) of the sales price as otherwise defined herein.
(d) Taxes previously paid on amounts represented by accounts found to
be worthless may be credited upon a subsequent payment of the tax provided in
this chapter or, if no such tax is due, refunded. If such accounts are there-
after collected, a tax shall be paid upon the amount so collected.
(e) Tangible personal property when sold at retail for more than eleven
cents (11¢) but less than one dollar and one cent ($1.01) through a vending
machine shall be deemed to have sold at a sales price equal to one hundred
seventeen percent (117%) of the price which is paid for such tangible per-
sonal property and/or its component parts including packaging by the owner
or operator of the vending machines.
(f) Sales price shall not include a gratuity or tip received when paid
to the service provider of a meal. The gratuity or tip can be either volun-
tary or mandatory, but must be given for the service provided and as a supple-
ment to the service provider's income.
(g) The sales price of a "new park model recreational vehicle" shall in-
clude one hundred percent (100%) of the sales price as otherwise defined in
this section.
SECTION 3. The provisions of this act shall apply to all appeals pend-
ing on and after January 1, 2026, involving interpretation or application of
sections 63-3612 and 63-3613, Idaho Code.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2026.